Hawaii, session 2025, SB513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that agriculture is a cornerstone and vital sector of Hawaii's economy.  However, farmers are facing increasing pressures to produce critically important agricultural products in the State.  Often, the most pressing issue is water scarcity, which exacerbates challenges experienced by local farmers and producers. The legislature further finds that current gray water guidelines, originally designed to protect public health and the environment, inadvertently hinder agricultural productivity, innovation, and sustainability.  Strict regulations governing the reuse of gray water, which includes wastewater from sinks, showers, and laundry, disproportionately affect small farms where farmers often find themselves limited in their ability to harness this valuable resource for irrigation. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize smaller farms of ten square acres or less in size, to utilize gray water to irrigate their farming operations. SECTION 2.  Section 342D-70, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The department may authorize any county to implement a gray water recycling program within its jurisdiction.  The gray water recycling program shall be limited to the use of gray water for the purpose of irrigating lawns [and], gardens[.], and farms of less than ten square acres that produce: (1)  Non-edible vegetation in areas with limited public access; (2)  Fodder, fiber, and seed crops not consumed by humans; or (3)  Timber and trees not bearing food crops. All use of gray water shall conform to the state plumbing code, chapter 3-183, Hawaii administrative rules." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.